incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS__فرغارید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>فرغارید</l><r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>فرغاریده</l><r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>فرغاران</l><r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>فرغار</l><r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>فرغار</l><r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>فرغار</l><r>فرغاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__فرستاد">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>فرستاد</l><r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>فرستاده</l><r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>فرستان</l><r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>فرست</l><r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>فرست</l><r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>فرست</l><r>فرستادن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__شکست">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شکست</l><r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شکسته</l><r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شکنان</l><r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شکن</l><r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>شکن</l><r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>شکن</l><r>شکستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__شنید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شنید</l><r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شنیده</l><r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شنوان</l><r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شنو</l><r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>شنو</l><r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>شنو</l><r>شنیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__شنواند">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شنواند</l><r>شنواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شنوانده</l><r>شنواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شنوانان</l><r>شنواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شنوان</l><r>شنواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>شنوان</l><r>شنواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>شنوان</l><r>شنواندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__شنفت">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شنفت</l><r>شنفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شنفته</l><r>شنفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شنوان</l><r>شنفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شنو</l><r>شنفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>شنو</l><r>شنفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>شنو</l><r>شنفتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__شناسانید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شناسانید</l><r>شناسانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شناسانیده</l><r>شناسانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شناسانان</l><r>شناسانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شناسان</l><r>شناسانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>شناسان</l><r>شناسانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>شناسان</l><r>شناسانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__شناساند">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شناساند</l><r>شناساندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>شناسانده</l><r>شناساندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شناسانان</l><r>شناساندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>شناسان</l><r>شناساندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>شناسان</l><r>شناساندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>شناسان</l><r>شناساندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="شکستن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__شکست"/></e>
                            <e lm="شناسانیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__شناسانید"/></e>
                            <e lm="شناساندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__شناساند"/></e>
                            <e lm="شنفتن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__شنفت"/></e>
                            <e lm="شنواندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__شنواند"/></e>
                            <e lm="شنیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__شنید"/></e>
                            <e lm="فرستادن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__فرستاد"/></e>
                            <e lm="فرغاریدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__فرغارید"/></e>
